Utah statutes.
78B-10-109.   Mediator's disclosure of conflicts of interest -- Background.

(1)  Before accepting a mediation, an individual who is requested to serve as a mediator shall:

(a)  make an inquiry that is reasonable under the circumstances to determine whether there are any known facts that a reasonable individual would consider likely to affect the impartiality of the mediator, including a financial or personal interest in the outcome of the mediation and an existing or past relationship with a mediation party or foreseeable participant in the mediation; and

(b)  disclose any known fact to the mediation parties as soon as practical before accepting a mediation.

(2)  If a mediator learns any fact described in Subsection (1)(a) after accepting a mediation, the mediator shall disclose it as soon as practicable.

(3)  At the request of a mediation party, an individual who is requested to serve as a mediator shall disclose the mediator's qualifications to mediate a dispute.

(4)  Subsections (1), (2), (3), and (6) do not apply to an individual acting as a judge or ombudsman.

(5)  This chapter does not require that a mediator have a special qualification by background or profession.

(6)  A mediator must be impartial, unless after disclosure of the facts required in Subsections (1) and (2) to be disclosed, the parties agree otherwise.

